Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.837

Right to waive benefit—Irrevocable choice.

Any member receiving or having received a distribution under chapter 41.34 RCW may make an irrevocable choice to waive all rights to a benefit under RCW 41.32.840 by notifying the department in writing of their intention.

[ 2003 c 349 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 349: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 16, 2003]." [ 2003 c 349 s 4.]